Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-959
Community colleges; role and mission assignments.

The role and mission assignments enumerated in sections 85-960 to 85-965 shall apply to the community college system and its areas and campuses. Such assignments shall prohibit, limit, or restrict only those programs or services provided for under such sections.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 43.